Utah statutes.
10-6-142.   City treasurer -- Receipts for payment.

The city treasurer shall give or cause to be given to every person paying money to the city treasury, a receipt or other evidence of payment therefor, specifying, as appropriate, the date of payment and upon which account paid and shall file the duplicate of the receipt, a summary report, or other evidence of payment in the office of the auditor or recorder.



Enacted by Chapter 26, 1979 General Session

